North Dakota, session 69, SB2317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-40.5-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-40.5-04. Revocation of transfer.
1. An agreement may be amended by further agreement of the parties in the same
manner as the original agreement was made. An agreement may be terminated as
provided in the agreement or, if no provision is made for the termination, by joint action
of all parties, or by an individual party not less than one year after its notice in writing
to all other parties. If a political subdivision that is a party to the agreement is
dissolved, the agreement may be terminated as provided in this section by the
governing body of the political subdivision upon its reincorporation or reestablishment,
by a petition submitted to the county and signed by a majority of the electors residing
within the previous territorial jurisdiction of the dissolved political subdivision, or in
some other manner specified in the agreement.
2. A township or city that unilaterally transferred its zoning authority to the county may
reacquire that zoning authority by mutual agreement between the board of county
commissioners and the board of township supervisors or city governing body.
3. A township that unilaterally transferred its zoning authority to the county may reacquire
zoning authority if the township:
Page No. 1 25.1086.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Board of township supervisors passes a written resolution supporting a return to
township zoning;
b. At the next annual meeting or at a special meeting, holds an election and the
majority of qualified electors vote in favor of a return to township zoning;
c. Adopts a comprehensive plan for the township;
d. Adopts a zoning ordinance; and
e. Appoints a zoning administrator.
4. If a township complies with the requirements under subsection 3, the county shal l
accept the township's reacquisition of zoning authority.
Page No. 2 25.1086.02000